Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5238
Dependent, defined.

Dependent shall mean a spouse, an unmarried child under the age of nineteen years, an unmarried child who is a full-time student under the age of twenty-three years and who is financially dependent upon the parent, and an unmarried child of any age who is medically certified as disabled and dependent upon the parent.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 16.